Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-1727
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 14-1726 to 14-1730, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Parking facilities means the entire surface or subsurface parking area and all improvements in such parking area or appurtenances used in connection with such parking area, including entrances and exits, and all equipment, machinery, and accessories necessary or convenient for the parking of vehicles; and

(2) Civic center means the area designated by the city council of a city of the metropolitan class in the master plan of the city as the site for city and county administrative, legislative, and judicial headquarters, together with such other governmental functions and subdivisions as may be deemed appropriate.

Laws 1969, c. 57, § 2, p. 360;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 310.
July 21, 2022